District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Tenant Buyout Agreement Transparency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42-3501.01 et. seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) A new Title VII-A to read as follows:
“TITLE VII-A. TENANT BUYOUT NOTIFICATION AND TRANSPARANCY.
“Sec. 711. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this title, the term:
“(1) “Buyout agreement” means a written agreement where an offeror pays a
tenant money or offers other consideration to:
“(A) Voluntarily vacate a rental unit; or


“(B) Assign purchase rights pursuant to section 406 of the Tenant
Opportunity to Purchase Act of 1980, effective September 10, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-86, D.C.
Official Code § 42-3404.06).
“(2) “Buyout offer” means an offer, written or oral, to a tenant to enter into a
buyout agreement.
“(3) “Disclosure notice” means the notice as set forth in section 713(a).
“(4) “Offeror” means a housing provider or other party initiating a buyout offer.
“Sec. 712. There is established within the Department of Housing and Community
Development a Tenant Buyout Notification Program, for the purposes of monitoring and
enforcement of buyout offers and buyout agreements to promote fair negotiations and
agreements and improve the predictability of transactions.
“Sec. 713. Buyout offers.
“(a) Before making a buyout offer, an offeror shall provide the tenant with a notice of
tenant rights, including the requirements of this title, in a form substantially prescribed by the
Department. This notice shall be dated and signed by the offeror and the tenant.
“(b) In making a buyout offer, an offeror shall:
“(1) Offer a tenant an amount equal to or greater than the relocation assistance
payments which a tenant would be entitled to pursuant to Section 703(b) of the Rental Housing
Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code § 42-3507.03); and
“(2) Offer the same amount to comparable tenants residing in the same housing
accommodation, accounting for household and unit size.
“Sec. 714 Buyout agreement requirements.


“(a) A buyout agreement shall be written in the primary language of the tenant and state
in a minimum of 12-point bold type above the tenant signature line as follows:
““You have a right not to enter into a buyout agreement. You may choose to consult with
an attorney before signing this buyout agreement.”
“(b) A buyout agreement shall be signed and dated by the landlord and tenant, and a copy
of the fully executed buyout agreement shall be given to the tenant.
“(c) The monetary payment of a fully executed buyout agreement shall be:
“(1) No less than the amount initially offered, as set forth in section 712(b); and
“(2) No greater than the maximum amount published by the Rental Housing
Commission, pursuant to Section 202(a)(2)(E) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July
17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.02(a)(2)(E)).
“(3) Paid in full immediately upon execution of the agreement. The offeror may
instead place the funds in a secure escrow account with the balance to be paid at a later
date. To do this, an offeror must provide the following as part of the agreement:
(A) A copy of the initial escrow account statement;
(B) A letter from the escrow agent confirming receipt of the funds and
detailing the terms of the agreement; and
(C) A copy of the escrow instructions signed by both parties.
“(d) An offeror shall file with the Department copies of the disclosure notice signed by
the tenant and the landlord, and the buyout agreement within 60 days of the buyout agreement
execution.
“Sec. 715. Enforcement.


“(a) Buyout agreements that do not satisfy all the requirements of this title shall be void
and unenforceable against the tenant.
“(b) Whenever a disclosure notice or buyout agreement does not conform to the
requirements of this title, the tenant shall have the right to cancel the buyout agreement through
the applicable statute of limitations period.”.
(b) Section 202(a)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.02(a)(2)) is amended by adding a
new sub-paragraph (E) to read as follows:
“(E) The maximum amount payable to a tenant under a tenant buyout
agreement, pursuant to section 225.”.
(c) A new section 225 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 225. Determination of maximum payment for tenant buyout agreements.
“(a) No later than 1 year after the effective date of this section, and no less than once
every 3 years thereafter, the Rental Housing Commission (“Commission”) shall determine the
maximum amounts payable to a tenant under a valid buyout agreement, as that term is defined in
section 711(2).
“(b) The Commission shall establish different thresholds for maximum payments based
on tenant and household characteristics, taking into consideration the following factors:
“(1) Household size;
“(2) Unit size;
“(3) Length of tenancy;
“(4) Status as an elderly or disabled tenant; and
“(5) The fair market rent for a comparable unit to the rental unit being vacated.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.